Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
CHAPTER 4 State, County, and Municipal Road Systems

Cross references.

Toll road and toll bridge licenses issued by counties and municipalities, §

36-60-21

.

Public works bidding, §

36-91-1

et seq.

Public bridge franchise issued by state, §

44-8-10

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey article on local government law, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (1998).